src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-nena_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each adjective:
# ok = checked against Marit/Maja
# ? = not checked
# c = Comp or Superl attested in corpus

Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 



  Noun - nenä: # nouns '(eng) nose / (fin) nenä' 
    nenä+N+Sg+Nom: nenä
    nenä+N+Sg+Gen: nenän
    nenä+N+Sg+Ill: nenäh
    nenä+N+Sg+Ine: nenäs
    nenä+N+Sg+Par: neniä

    sana+N+Sg+Nom: sana
    sana+N+Sg+Gen: sanan
    sana+N+Sg+Ill: sanah
    sana+N+Sg+Ine: sanas
    sana+N+Sg+Par: sanua

    sorzu+N+Sg+Nom: sorzu
    sorzu+N+Sg+Gen: sorzan
    sorzu+N+Sg+Ill: sorzah
    sorzu+N+Sg+Ine: sorzas
    sorzu+N+Sg+Par: sorzua

    ladu+N+Sg+Nom: ladu
    ladu+N+Sg+Gen: lavun
    ladu+N+Sg+Ill: laduh
    ladu+N+Sg+Ine: lavus
    ladu+N+Sg+Par: laduu

    kyly+N+Sg+Nom: kyly
    kyly+N+Sg+Gen: kylyn
    kyly+N+Sg+Ill: kylyh
    kyly+N+Sg+Ine: kylys
    kyly+N+Sg+Par: kylyy

    heiny+N+Sg+Nom: heiny
    heiny+N+Sg+Gen: heinän
    heiny+N+Sg+Ill: heinäh
    heiny+N+Sg+Ine: heinäs
    heiny+N+Sg+Par: heiniä

    kello+N+Sg+Nom: kello
    kello+N+Sg+Gen: kellon
    kello+N+Sg+Ill: kelloh
    kello+N+Sg+Ine: kellos
    kello+N+Sg+Par: kelluo

    pöllö+N+Sg+Nom: pöllö
    pöllö+N+Sg+Gen: pöllön
    pöllö+N+Sg+Ill: pöllöh
    pöllö+N+Sg+Ine: pöllös
    pöllö+N+Sg+Par: pöllyö

    lehti+N+Sg+Nom: lehti
    lehti+N+Sg+Gen: lehten
    lehti+N+Sg+Ill: lehteh
    lehti+N+Sg+Ine: lehtes
    lehti+N+Sg+Par: lehtie

    kukki+N+Sg+Nom: kukki
    kukki+N+Sg+Gen: kukin
    kukki+N+Sg+Ill: kukkih
    kukki+N+Sg+Ine: kukis
    kukki+N+Sg+Par: kukkii

    čoma+A+Sg+Nom: čoma
    čoma+A+Sg+Gen: čoman
    čoma+A+Sg+Ill: čomah
    čoma+A+Sg+Ine: čomas
    čoma+A+Sg+Par: čomua

    hyvä+A+Sg+Nom: hyvä
    hyvä+A+Sg+Gen: hyvän
    hyvä+A+Sg+Ill: hyväh
    hyvä+A+Sg+Ine: hyväs
    hyvä+A+Sg+Par: hyviä

    kylmy+A+Sg+Nom: kylmy
    kylmy+A+Sg+Gen: kylmän
    kylmy+A+Sg+Ill: kylmäh
    kylmy+A+Sg+Ine: kylmäs
    kylmy+A+Sg+Par: kylmiä

    vilu+N+Sg+Nom: vilu
    vilu+N+Sg+Gen: vilun
    vilu+N+Sg+Ill: viluh
    vilu+N+Sg+Ine: vilus
    vilu+N+Sg+Par: viluu

    ondo+A+Sg+Nom: ondo
    ondo+A+Sg+Gen: onnon
    ondo+A+Sg+Ill: ondoh
    ondo+A+Sg+Ine: onnos
    ondo+A+Sg+Par: onduo

    töhlö+N+Sg+Nom: töhlö
    töhlö+N+Sg+Gen: töhlön
    töhlö+N+Sg+Ill: töhlöh
    töhlö+N+Sg+Ine: töhlös
    töhlö+N+Sg+Par: töhlyö
